Arkansas, session 2025, HB1768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 6, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
8-6-609. Host fee.
(a) As used in this section, "host community" means the county and
city in which the proposed, current, or expanded site of the solid waste
landfill is located.
(b)(1) An agreement or contract for a host fee shall not exceed a
contract term of four (4) years ending in December of even-numbered years.
(2) The agreement or contract for a host fee may be renewed for an additional
term not to exceed four (4) years at the same amount of the host fee or
renegotiated for a new amount of the host fee.
*JMB191*
04-02-2025 09:50:42 JMB191

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 H4/2/25 HB1768
(3) This section does not limit the times that an agreement or
contract for a host fee may be renewed.
(4) Any contract or agreement for a host fee:
(A) Shall have a beginning date and an end date or an
extension date; and
(B) Shall not have the host fee as a provision in
perpetuity within the contract or agreement.
(c) The agreement or contract for a host fee shall be voted on at a
regularly scheduled meeting of the host community and signed by either the
mayor of the city or the county judge if a municipality is not the closest
governmental unit.

/s/Lundstrum























04-02-2025 09:50:42 JMB191